th: การออกแบบปลาย: สองด้าน; หัวเปลี่ยนได้; ปลายเปลี่ยนได้; ด้านเดียว; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Design da ponta: Duas pontas; Cabeças intercambiáveis; Ponta substituível; Ponta única; Outro
zh-CN: 端部设计: 双头; 可更换头; 可更换头部; 单头; 其他
fi: Pään muotoilu: Kaksipäinen; Vaihdettavat päät; Vaihdettava kärki; Yksipäinen; Muu
el: Σχεδιασμός άκρου: Διπλού άκρου; Εναλλάξιμες κεφαλές; Ανταλλάξιμη άκρη; Μονού άκρου; Άλλο
fr: Conception des extrémités: Double extrémité; Têtes interchangeables; Embout remplaçable; Asymétrique; Autre
da: Endedesign: Dobbeltendet; Udskiftelige hoveder; Udskiftelig spids; Enkeltende; Andet
nb: Endedesign: Dobbeltsidig; Utskiftbare hoder; Utskiftbar spiss; Enkeltsidig; Annet
ro-RO: Design capete: Cu două capete; Capete interschimbabile; Vârf înlocuibil; Cu un singur capăt; Altele
tr: Uç tasarımı: Çift uçlu; Değiştirilebilir başlıklar; Değiştirilebilir uç; Tek uçlu; Diğer
hr-HR: Dizajn kraja: Dvostrano; Izmjenjive glave; Zamjenjiv vrh; Jednostrano; Ostalo
ko: 끝 디자인: 양면; 교체 가능한 헤드; 교체 가능한 팁; 단면; 기타
pt-PT: Design da ponta: Dupla extremidade; Cabeças intercambiáveis; Ponta substituível; Extremidade individual; Outro
it: Design dell'estremità: A doppia estremità; Testine intercambiabili; Punta sostituibile; A estremità singola; Altro
de: Enddesign: Doppelende; Austauschbare Köpfe; Austauschbare Spitze; Einzelende; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 端部設計: 單端; 可替換刷頭; 可替換頭; 單端; 其他
vi: Thiết kế đầu: Hai đầu; Đầu thay thế; Đầu thay thế; Một đầu; Khác
sv: Änddesign: Dubbelsidig; Utbytbara huvuden; Utbytbar spets; Enkelsidig; Övrigt
hu: Vég kialakítása: Kétvégű; Cserélhető fejek; Cserélhető hegy; Egyvégű; Egyéb
lt-LT: Galo dizainas: Dvipusė; Keičiamos galvutės; Keičiamas antgalis; Vienpusė; Kita
pl: Konstrukcja końcówek: Dwustronny; Wymienne główki; Wymienna końcówka; Pojedyncze; Inne
cs: Konstrukce konců: Oboustranná; Vyměnitelné hlavice; Vyměnitelný hrot; Jednostranná; Jiné
nl: Eindontwerp: Dubbelzijdig; Verwisselbare koppen; Vervangbare punt; Enkelzijdig; Andere
sl-SI: Zasnova konca: Dvostranski; Zamenljive glave; Zamenljiva konica; Enostranski; Drugo
ja: エンド設計: ダブルエンド; 交換可能ヘッド; 交換可能チップ; シングルエンド; その他
bg-BG: Дизайн на краищата: Двустранно; Сменяеми глави; Сменяем връх; Едностранно; Други
en: End design: Double-ended; Interchangeable heads; Replaceable tip; Single-ended; Other
sk-SK: Dizajn koncovky: Obojstranný; Vymeniteľné hlavice; Vymeniteľný hrot; Jednostranný; Iné
es: Diseño del extremo: Doble punta; Cabezales intercambiables; Punta reemplazable; Un solo extremo; Otros
ru: Дизайн концов: Двусторонний; Сменные насадки; Сменный наконечник; Односторонний; Другой